Utah statutes.
77-30-1.   Definitions.

Where appearing in this act, the term "governor" includes any person performing the functions of governor by authority of the law of this state. The term "executive authority" includes the governor and any person performing the functions of governor in a state other than this state. The term "state," referring to a state other than this state, includes any other state or territory, organized or unorganized, of the United States of America.

